>Shattered, but not lost(Wolfdog, Human; Romance, Torture, Gore, Hand-holding, Sci-fi)

Anon is a human filled with rage and anger, he dedicated his life to crime and nearly sacrificied his humanity for it, all he wants is money and power and he strives to do anything to achieve his goal, or is that really what he wants and needs?

Chapter 1 – Living Nightmare

>Run, run as fast as possible.
>That was the only thought you had as you were running through the backstreets of whatever the town you were right now in.
>You are Claudia, your mother was a German shepherd and your father was a gray wolf, so you were essentially a breed mix called a wolfdog.
>That is really not important right now, as there are 3 men in black suits chasing after you.
>You don’t know their intention, their plan, nothing, you just want to escape and be alone.
>As you are running past all the red lights, shouting people and the gardens of random people’s homes there is only one thought on your mind.
>Why did this happen?
>Why to me?
>As you run through the streets your legs burning like never before, your forehead bleeding massively forcing you to not be able to see because the blood got into your eyes, and ignoring the pain in your broken fingers, you are left to think about the past events of this fateful day.
>During your childhood your mother always restricted the time you had with other anthros and just generally the time you had free.
>But it was okay you understood she only wanted best, and you always complied and did everything mother said.
>After all she given you so much and all you ever did was just bother her with what she was doing.
>You usually never saw your father, he was busy working and making money for our family.
>Whenever he came home, he did not talk to you much and hid himself in his room.
>Mother always said it was because his work was very hard and he himself worked himself too much just for the good of the family.
>You always looked up to him, a strong man that only wished the best for his family.
>So whenever he shouted at you, or beat you up you knew he only did because he wanted all of us to be healthy.
>As you aged and studied hard to make your parents proud they had given you a job to help them.
>You wanted to impress and not fail your mother and father, so you did the best you could, often getting praised for the strategies you often came up with.
>Working as a dispatcher for trucks was not exactly the most usual job for a girl of your age, as well as being the head of logistics to make sure all the cargo went where it was supposed to go.
>The weirdest part was that you did not have any actual trucks, your job was to sort of to connect drivers with those who needed cargo to be delivered without them ever knowing what or with who it is being delivered, just like a 3rd wheel.
>Mother and father always told you it’s because its easy profit and not that much danger is involved, you were also told it was mostly electronics, vegetables and other random but harmless cargo, and whenever you asked something more you were told to not worry about it.
>Things were going well, until your father started becoming more and more angry.
>Business started to not go as well, and you tried as hard as you can to get more customers, but everything started to fall.
>Cargo started going missing, payments were not made.
>You were really sorry and thought it was your fault and tried to fix it.
>You came with an amazing new strategy with your father from a contact he had gotten.
>A lot of the times you redirected the cargo towards a brand-new checkpoint where the trucks would have gotten a special price and gifts as mentioned by your father.
>Business bloomed, and you were making a lot of money.
>Until today
>Father was not home, and mother looked very distraught all morning.
>You only woke up just a couple hours ago and were still in your pajamas.
>While going through business mails on your computer you heard something. 
>There was a loud sound of someone breaking a window, after that you heard your Mother shout something, but before she could finish there was another loud bang. 
>Your heart sank, you knew what you heard, panic started to arise.
>You wanted to shout, to scream, but somehow you knew that was a bad idea.
>A short while after you heard the shot you bolted behind the couch hoping for some comfort.
>The door to your room started to move, someone wanted to desperately get in. 
>To your shock and horror, they had a key, and opened the door.
>Blood started to boil, and you started crying, only to be surprised by your mother’s voice.
“Claudy where are you, please be here, respond to me please, oh god please.”
>You bolted as fast you could to your mother’s arms, and started crying into her shoulder.
>She was shaking, terrified and hold you in a deathly grip, that did not last for long though, as she swiped away your tears and looked directly into your eyes.
“You must run, run and hide, do not ever let them get to you. I am so sorry, our business is not clean, never was, we are criminals, we did so many bad things with your father, especially your father, please forgive us. Beware of the cyborgs, DO NOT LET THEM EVER GET TO YOU, AND DO NOT TRUST THEM!!!” 
>She said as she started crying harder then you ever though were possible.
 “Please, just know that I always loved you, I did all that I did for you”.
>She was always strict to you, but you knew she only wanted the best.
“Of course I did, I don’t know what is going on, or by who just know that your father is….”
>She did not have time to finish the sentence, your blinking reflex was too fast and as your eyes were closed you started to feel a warm liquid on your face.
>Oh god please no, you opened your eyes and saw something which could not be described as nothing else but a living nightmare.
>The mother you loved so much, the one that cared for you, and was always there for you.
>Her head no longer the shape you remember so much vividly.
>You could not describe how awful it was no matter how hard you tried, you felt your mind implode.
>Your mind was nothing…. Empty, you felt no emotion, nothing.
>Vision started to fade, all was becoming black.
>You hoped you died, you hoped it was over, you did not want this, why.
>WHYYY!!!!

Chapter 2 - The run

>Is there an earthquake? 
>Or are you the one that is moving?
>Your vision stars to come back online, still too blurry though, so you try to help them a little with your arm.
>Only for something stopping that from happening, your hands are tied, wait.
>The next moment hits you like a truck, no like a tank going at Mach 1, the breaking in, the gunshots, your family… Oh god your family.
>Your brain goes into total overdrive, every one of your senses becoming berserk.
>Tears start falling, your entire body shaking and kicking. 
>The felling you feel now cannot be explained nor compared to anything, the distress, the anger, the sadness. 
>As you slowly start to get back in control of your body you take a look around and notice you are in a vehicle of some sort.
>A van judging by the fact you cannot see outside.
>Wait, you can talk, scream, so you try, only to once again be stopped by a foreign object in your mouth.
>Things cannot possibly be worse now, what will you even do? You lost everything.
>Just as an existential crisis is around the corner and depression is already grasping you, you hear a muffled voice.
“Oi, those cocksuckers bitch is waking up, she is real fucking loud if we get stopped by the fucking police I am going to freaking kill you before they kill me.” 
>He sounds really angry and pissed, shortly after you hear a much calmer voice respond.
“Just chill dude, she is going to fetch us a real buck somewhere on the market, if not I am sure I can find a use for her.”
>What did he mean by that? Are you going to be tortured? Killed? Or worse, a slave?
“I aint chilling for shit, this whole idea is going to get us killed, the boss did not tell us which family we are fucking going to. We are going to get killed you idiot. Just fucking stop this fucking thing and let me kill her. We don’t have any use for her and it’s going to be even more trouble when they found out she is alive.”
“Seriously dude calm the fuck down, you are alive now, aren’t you? Besides we are going to get payed like kings either way, she is just a little bonus.”
>Their conversation keeps going, however you choose to not listen to it anymore.
>You try to put the pieces of what the fuck just happened today together.
>As you do, you even feel a little anger since you apparently helped to do something that got your family killed, with you probably following short soon.
>Mothers last words scream the most loudest in your mind.
“Beware of the cyborg” 
>What did she mean by these? 
>There are loads of rich and powerful people running around with what are called augmentations, some choose only a minor change like fur color, maybe eye color, while other are willing to exchange their limb for a so-called upgrade.
>You never were one of those, you wanted to stay as pure as you could as well as your mother telling you it will only bring trouble.
>The world was already full of crime, but one day these… humans started appearing out of nowhere.
>There was loads of discussions, news story and many many theories.
>At first not much has changed, and in general it really hasn’t, except in the country you currently lived in.
>Over the couple years after humans started showing up, the crime rate in these parts started to sky rocket, there was new story almost every day about someone getting killed, kidnaped, the many many raids on drug factories, and about your city especially. 
>It was like this city was at the center of it all. 
>Funny enough when all this started to happen the family business started to bloom so you were not worried 
>Maybe your family had something to do with it?
>No there is no way, mother and father would never do such a thing, they cared too much about you.
>Your thoughts are quickly silenced by a really loud shout though.
“WATCH OUT FOR THAT...!”

…………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>The taste of blood, fills your mouth and it quickly brings you back to your senses.
>You are still in the van, only more forward, a lot more forward, also…wait… why are laying on the side of van?
>There is a bright light shining as you turn your head to look around, the backdoor is open, seems like the van crashed.
>By some miracle you became untied and you no longer have anything in your mouth.
>A quick check of yourself confirms you are still in one piece.
>Wait, you need to run, you need to run now.
>You crawl out of the van, and look back to see the carnage.
>The van is laying on its side crashed into what seems to be a pile of parked cars.
>From an extremely quick check you notice 2 bodies near the front.
>One is breathing, the other not so much.
>You check your injuries, Fingers seems to not respond, there is blood pouring from your forehead.
>Before you are able to check your injuries more, you see a black armored SUV approach, its seems to be heavily scraped.
>This was no accident, whoever was in that SUV deliberately crashed into the van and send it flying.
>There is no time to think, you bolt it, into the nearest backstreet.
>A sudden pain brings you back from your thoughts.
>A quick look at your legs makes you realize how much adrenaline you have at this moment.
>Your pajamas are an absolute torn mess soaked with blood, your blood.
>The pain starts being worse and worse, you feel your most important body part as of right is starting to fail you.
>With one last step, the pain becomes too much, you take a wrong step and you are send to the cold gray pavement below. 
>The injuries you already have make the fall even worse, you feel you are no longer able to recover from the fall, the pain is too much.
>The floor is cold and unforgiving, you close your eyes and await your fate, there is nothing else you can do, you lost.
>You hear footsteps approaching, without a word someone forces you to your knees, you feel a bag being put over your head, only for everything to become dark... too dark.

Chapter 3 – The Cyborg

>Your head, it hurts so bad, like a hammer being swung directly at your skull repeatedly to the rhythm of your heartbeat.
>Trying to move is futile, you barely feel your body,
>No surprise there, being knocked out 3 times in a day does that, even though one of them technically doesn’t count, but it was the worst one.
>Yup you are once again aware of yourself, the depression says to you.
> You try to open your eyes, only to see nothing, not surprising really, you faintly remember a bag being put over your head before you were knocked out.
>The sensation of feeling something comes back to you, and you feel you are being dragged somewhere.
>Just barely you are able to ask where you are, and why.
>It all goes to vain, nobody responds, or even show a sign of stopping the dragging of your body.
>Before you speak again though you hear a door being open following by the sound of voice that immediately brings a chill to your spine and makes your fur stand out.
“Put her on that chair, ditch the bag and leave.”
>His voice was extremely calm, but sounded incredibly powerful, just from the sound of his voice alone you were instantly worried. 
>It was deep with a bit of even deeper distorted echo following it.
>They put you down on said chair and removed the bag.
>The bright lights in the room immediately blind you and make everything in the room blurry.
>As your vision adjust, you realize this is no ordinary room, it was huge with many expensive pieces of furniture scattered around with the perfect architecture. An assortment of weapons from blades to plasma shotguns and even bigger weapons which you had no idea what they really were, were placed on the walls clearly ready to be used.
>The center of the room was filled with a very clean and pristine looking carpet which lead to a table made of what you though was the most exotic and expensive looking wood you ever laid your eyes upon.
> It looked very old and vintage but was made to look like it just came out of the factory a minute ago. 
>On top of the table you saw a vast collection of electronics, the biggest of them being a computer that you recognize because you saw it on internet as the most powerful system made to date, next to it was another device of even bigger proportions connecting what seemed to look like a monitor, yet a lot more…. weird.
>Behind it all sitting on a chair straight of a history film about kings and queens, was the source of the voice, a human.
>As you begin to focus on his details you notice how terrifying and scary he looks.
>He was wearing an expensive piece of suit, which did nothing to hide his very muscly looking body.
>You traveled your eyes across his big and powerful right hand, you noticed he was wearing an expensive watch, the watch alone probably costed more then everything you ever owned. In his hand he held a cigar.
>You switched your gaze to his other arm Instead of the suit continuing however it seemed to be carefully cut as to not run down his left arm to show what really was there.
>To your shock it was not a really an arm, but a completely cybernetic and powerful piece of machinery formed roughly into a shape of an arm.
>The metal looked very clean and you could see the reflection of the entire room in them, it clashed very well with the mixture of the bright red streaks and black wires. It looked… to put it simply, astonishing. It looked very aesthetically pleasing while looking like it could survive a blast from a tank with barely a scratch.
>Instead of a left hand you simply saw what could only be described as a pair of cybernetic fingers which moved with the precision of a surgeon, the so-called hand looked like it could be armored up and switched for a much sturdier looking claw, which just by the looks of it could shatter stones. You tried looking for more detail but that was all you could notice from this distance.
>You finally set your gaze on his face, half of it is what you expected a human to look like, The other half, not so much. The same metal as was on his arm with streaks of striking red glowing veins extended to his face mixing with flesh.
>To say it looked intimidating would be an understatement he looked like he could kill you with only his gaze.
>His human eye was a dark brown, while his other was glowing red, it still looked like a normal eye, except for the glow and the red streaks all around his pupils which simulated lightning.
>He had dark brown hair, perfectly groomed into haircut, you never thought a haircut could look intimidating and show power, yet there it was. 
>He clearly saw your terrified look as you realized what he really was, as confirmed by him giving you a grin which could shatter the confidence of any living creature.
>A half-man, half-machine, a cyborg.

Chapter 4 – A new home

“Well well, what do we have here.”
>He said with terrifying voice of his while cracking his knuckles using his cybernetic fingers.
“You probably have questions, and believe me so do I, but how about you tell me your name.”
>In most scenarios you would be pissing your pants right now and would not even dare to answer his question, but in this circumstance, you just don’t care, so you ask him who is he and what he wants, trying to sound as calm as possible.
“Oh my, a fierce one, I like it, I’m gonna enjoy breaking you sweetie.” He did not seem to even acknowledge you asked him something, other than not what he asked.
>He stood up and walked slowly to you, making sure to keep his eyes focus directly into yours.
>Now you can truly see him in his full display.
>He was massive both in height and width, with him being at least 7 feet judging from this distance.
>His fancy trend continued with straight black trousers that struggled to hide his muscle on his right leg. Your suspicion of him really being a cyborg was only confirmed by his other leg being completely replaced by what looked very similar to a leg, but had red glowing streaks, and those familiar black wires. 
>You swear it looked like this on purpose just to make sure you know that its not just a simple walking aid.
>On the side of his leg you saw huge rectangle openings from which you faintly saw an orange to red glow, no doubt being used to relieve pressure and heat. 
>You also saw what looked to be some kind sword in a holster that was pulsating and glowing red.
>Your observations were interrupted by his voice, admittedly raising the volume quite a lot more with a hint of anger added.
“You better start showing manners mutt, or else you are gonna seriously regret it. Now I will not ask again.” 
>His voice got louder and louder until he was right in front of you. 
>He got close to your ear and whispered.
“What is your name?”
>All his anger gone in an instant, the tone of his voice was calm, and he made sure to put emphasis on the word “name”.
>You felt he had total control over you, there was no denying it.
>You carefully stuttered your name to him.
>He lifted his human arm and put his hands around your neck, making sure you were able to breath and not get hurt.
 “That will be master to you, now try again and do not stutter, my hand has this habit of magically closing really tightly when I hear stuttering.”
>You swallowed, hard and told him your name once again followed by calling him master.
>His grip on your throat was released, he stood up, looked directly into your yes and he used his hand to swipe the dried blood of your forehead.
“Good girl, you will do fine, yeeeess, just fine.”
>His word yes had a very noticeable and exaggerated echo behind it forcing all of your fur to stand, he clearly noticed this by showing a slight smug.
>He turned away and started going back to his table but before that he calmly and quietly said.
“Jack”.
>Almost as immediately as he finished his word you heard a door behind you being open from which a black German shepherd in a black suit stood and awaited orders.
“Take our guest to Sabrina, oh and don’t worry sweetie we talk again soon.”
>The German shepherd nodded and approached you with the intention of taking you to whoever Sabrina was.
>Only now you realized you were not actually tied, so you stood up to face the German shepherd called Jack, you had enough of being carried away.
>Just as you did though you heard a voice behind you from a now pissed off man sitting in his chair.
“I though we went over this, you better behave or else the only way you are going to be carried is by a mop of our janitor after I will turn your organs into goulash, understand?”
>Did you already fuck up what little chance you had? 
>All you can do is look on the ground and quietly stumble out a yes.
“YES WHAT?”
>He shouted angrily even getting a slight wince from Jack.
>You apologized and repeated your words followed by another master as you were supposed to.
“Now fuck off!”

Chapter 5 – Empty

>After you and Jack left the room and slowly and properly closed the door you were told to follow the said German shepherd.
>You tried to slowly walk only to be stopped by abrupt pain, oh right your legs are covered by blood.
>You try to explain this to Jack, but he doesn’t even seem to care.
“You better start moving or else you are going to have a very bad day; the boss isn’t the only one you should fear.” 
>You tried once again to follow him, only for the pain to be too much and you fall on the floor.
“Oh, fuck me.” 
>He cleared looked and sounded annoyed.
>He grabbed you by the shoulder and despite your cries of pain started dragging you.
>Through all the pained you hoped this Sabrina was close, although you just wanted all of this to be over.
>As you were dragged along, the pain suddenly stopped, and you were left to your thoughts.
>Your mother dead, the first human you saw in your life clearly trying to make you his pet, and not one living being that cared about you being here, or alive.
>You have nothing anymore, you feel nothing anymore, no pain, no love, no spark that would make you try to live your life.
>Tears start flowing again, but not of sadness, not of regret, but because there is nothing left, what is the point of life?
>Why wake up in the morning?
>Why try to go through so much effort just to keep yourself alive, when there is nothing and noone waiting?
>Your mother and father were all you ever had, all you did was for them, now she is dead and him probably too.
>You did not even realize you were already laying on some kind of bed while a distorted shape looked at you and tried to say something.
>Huh, how crazy is that, someone talking to me, maybe they will go away after a while.
>The only thing you heard was your heartbeat, the fast and terrifying never stopping beat of your pathetic life.
>You felt a strong pain in your chest, it was not a pain you ever felled before.
>Mother always used to discipline you if you did something wrong and this pain was not even close to that.
>Was it regret?
>Was it death approaching?
>You did not know.
>You did not want to know.
>But another horrible feeling started creeping into your head.
>You were afraid, very afraid, terrified.
>Not because of the man or the pain or death even.
>You were afraid because you did not know what will happen now, or later, or ever.
>You just want this to end.

Chapter 6 – Dead man walking

>You are anon
>You just had another bag of money left the door, in a little... damaged state but nothing a few weeks or months of training won’t fix.
>Business was going pretty well this couple of months, but one of your big and trusted logistic partners just got killed.
>It will hurt the business a bit, but you already had backup plans so it’s all good.
>It all started when you got a call from now a very dead individual calling for help, you promised protection, but you cannot just keep an eye on every one of your partners 24/7.
>you send a few of your crew to help and salvage anything they could, you already knew the family was dead, but better to make sure and to take any things that was left, money is money after all.
>you were already beyond rich but its good to make sure money doesn’t blind you, and only serve as an aid, so you take any chance you can to get more.
>You also wanted to make sure you catch whoever just ordered an execution to one of your partners, that was not very nice, and you are going to make sure he or she knows.
>It was a nice surprise that their you assume daughter survived.
>Pets were becoming a really nice bag of money for those rich enough to afford it, and those willing to break the minds of those who would became the said money bags.
>That’s all they were to you really, a bag of money that’s a little … persuasion to grow in value.
>In you past life you learned from experience that no one wants to play nice with you and would rather just take advantage of you rather than anything else, especially if there is money involved.
>So you learned to have no emotion when working, or at any other time.
>From what you gathered the residents of this place were anthros, basically animals from your world turned human.
>You never understood why they call each other like that, but you never really cared so you just went with it.
>Back when you showed up here there were already some humans present but not even close to any reasonable number, now the human population has grown but its still minuscule compared to the rest.
>Your little memory presentation gets stopped as you get a message that the prisoner is ready according to all of your orders.
>Very good, with the bag of money with wolf ears, your crew managed to capture one of the drivers as well, the other apparently did not survive the crash.
>As you suspected they were amateurs, too loud, obnoxious and did not even wear the seatbelt, how very very unfortunate.
>You order to put him into one of the interrogation rooms, along with a special request for some iron rods and starting the furnace.
>You already knew what you wanted to do with the unfortunate fellow, ohhh you are going to enjoy this, maybe he will too, you doubt it though.
>As you think of the many ways you can brake your new idiot, you arrive at the room in the basement.
>The main interrogation room which you ordered your guest to be had a nice big furnace at back, no windows, brick walls and a nice set of steel tables along the sides surrounding a steel table in the middle.
>The steel table was made specifically to order, it had leather restraints and was completely mechanical for easy adjustments and easy access to any part required.
>As you open the steel door to the room you see everything was put like you wanted it.
>dimmed lights, a roaring furnace, a nice set of iron rods of variable sizes and shapes, and tables full of tools, equipment and toys.
>Not sexual ones, oh noooo, you don’t want him to feel any pleasure, there is no fun in that, instead you have a selection of knives, saws, hammers, axes and pretty much anything you would ever need.
>And in the middle strapped to a steel table in a horizontal position, a strapped black wolf with a terrified expression.
“Who are you? And what do you want?”
¬>A very distraught and scared sounding voice echoes through the room,
>”Oh, no, that wont do” you say with a bit of disappointment and a look of disproval.
>”Rule number one my friend, having manners is key and make this whole thing a lot more”
>You walk around the room looking at the desperate wolf... wait no...a fox… from all angles.
>After a quick walk around you grab two pieces of the iron, one very flat and a more pointier one.
>you carefully put them into the furnace making sure the fox watches your every move.
“W-what are you doing?”
>Well he definitely noticed, “Oh don’t worry about that, that’s for later, lets make sure we focus on whats now”.
“what do you mean later, or now?” 
>He is getting even more scared, what a bitch, this guy is a killer? Not in a million years, probably just along the ride for what else than money, no mercy on this one, pff like you ever even give mercy, more like a faster death, yeah that’s more your style.
>Before he has a change to speak again, you walk up to him and put your mechanical hand over his snout. “Shh, no talking without permission, I ask the questions and you answer.”
>he just shakily nods, and you put your hand away, you slowly walk to your table and start picking up a nice looking knife.
>A stainless steel sushi knife, very nice.
>As you look at your knife you ask the fox about his name.
“Its…”
>You know what? Fuck him, you don’t need this idiots name as you make sure you very loudly tell to him.
>”Lets play a little game, I am sure you already know it, its called This little piggy.” You say with a happy tone to your voice as you walk up to him making sure he gets a good glance at your knife.
“P-please no, I will say anything you want, do anything you want, pay you all the money I have, just don’t hurt me”
>Yup, a giant pussy, not even a scratch and he is already begging, this was waay too easy, nah, no way he is gonna ruin your fun.
¬>You begin to ask some random questions about him, its good to have some banter before the real ride begins right?
>You find out he is actually a pornstar and quite a dick, he is going to love what you planned for him as he mentioned this fact.
>Enough talking, we play now.
>”Shh, now let me start” You place your knife into your right hand and slowly move it above his fingers.
>He makes a big fist and tries to move away but the leather straps around his wrists keeping them in place.
>You start happily singing the song, making sure to cut his finger off at every sentence.
>His screams are wonderful, a true background beat to your song.
“Whyyy? Oh god whyyyy? I said I will do anything you ask of me, why are you doing this?”
>He barely managed to say through all his screams and tears.
>You make sure he knows that would be no fun, as you finish with the last finger.
>As you walked to the furnace to grab the now burning red iron, you don’t want him to bleed out after all, where is the fun in that?
>You grab it with your mechanical arm with no effort or pain and you walk up to the fox waving iron in front of his eyes like a giant glowstick.
“What are you gonna do with that?
>”Oh this? Well here have a taste.” You throw the burning metal onto his torso as he begins screaming in agony even more.
>After a few satisfying seconds you grab the metal back and close his wounds on the fingers to stop the bleeding getting a few more screams.
“Now you said you were a pornstar eh? What were to happen if your main tool in this job of yours would be sold eh? What price should I ask?”
>All you get is a very mortified expression, oh well you weren’t the one for questions anyway.
>His dick is the focus of your game now, you grab a very sharp scalpel and begin to castrate the fox along with pretty much cutting his dick halfway through.
>Let’s just say his expressions were the most fascinating you saw in a long time.
>You make sure to close the wounds very quickly and precisely, him dying or passing out now would be very sad.
>This trend of cutting and then healing the wounds with a hot piece of metal continues on for a while, after his body is filled with scars and his voice no longer functional enough to scream you know it’s time for the finale.
>Now its time to start asking questions about the whole little job he was involved in.
>You enjoyed torture and the actual information was secondary to you.
>The broken fox gives you everything he knew, except the part telling you who he was working for.
“Please, no more, I don’t know who they are, I never saw them. I told you everything I know. The job we got was through online interaction only, we got payed did the job no questions asked, so please just stop this, please have at least some sympathy, please.”
>His crying really is pathetic, and you know he is saying the truth, but still you wanted this finale either way, why stop now?
>You say you believe him then grab the pointier iron from the furnace.
>This time you use another tool to grab the iron with your human right hand.
>”But believing doesn’t do shit to the fact you killed of one of my partners.”
>He stars panicking even more, like his energy and adrenaline went into overdrive.
>You reinforce your hand into much more claw looking one and a lot more armored.
>Your hand had two modes, either a more flexible and dexterous and soft hand, or a armored and powerful claw, although it was still a hand with five fingers all of them weren’t very maneuverable and very massive.
>With your armored hand for added effect you grab his head making sure it is looking at the ceiling and does not move an inch.
>Through his screams and trashing about you carefully and slowly descend the burning red iron into his eye socket, he reflexively closes it, that will not help.
>After you hold it for a reasonable time, he no longer has any energy left and passes out, a pretty nice stamina if you do say yourself.
>You throw the iron away into the corner and message Sabrina to come heal him up and throw him in a cage and leave him to die of starvation.
>Why heal? You want him to suffer, no mercy, not now, not ever.
>After a long day of work you head out to sleep, the room where you slept was not very huge, but had a giant bed with a lot of cushions and pillows, you after all you loved a comfortable and well-deserved sleep.
>Not before a quick shower though, you loved staying clean, well shaved and properly maintained.
>Next to the bed was a huge machine, which was essentially a big dispenser for your mechanical body.
>To power the whole armor you required to recharge in a way, every few days.
>Your reactor that was stored in your left leg (apparently to be as far from the important stuff).
>It was powered by a very powerful reaction of some kind of chemicals which you needed to refill.
>You never really were sure, but your doctor and mechanic of sorts knew and that’s all you cared about.
>No one except you knew about him, and you made sure he doesn’t need to see anyone.
>You pay him an ungodly amount of money every month to keep him at your side and be loyal to only you.
>He also supplied you with all the medication you took on a daily basis.
>Most were suppressants for your body.
>Your body did not like the invasion of the mechanical parts of your and certainly let it be known.
>You were forced to basically kill of all your immune system and replace with a sort biomechanical one.
>Your body was constantly in high body temperature, temperature that would kill of any other living thing within minutes.
>But your medication and the foreign body in your fought of all that off keeping you alive.
>It did not fight off the pain though, every living minute, every second, you feel you are at the brink of death.
>Constant pain, constant headaches, constant feeling of the death incoming, it was all horrible and not possible to describe.
>But you have come this far, and suffered so much already, that you sort of…  get used to it.
>as you dress yourself in the most comfortable pajamas you can and put away your sword into its place, you try to find a comfortable place to lay down.
>Impossible, you never could sleep, instead being forced to program your body to basically put you into a manual sleep with chemicals.
>As the chemicals do their magic you begin to finally feel the pain leave, and darkness overtakes your vision.

Chapter 7 – The Blade

>The sun stars to rise and cover your room in its light, you were the sort of guy that the slightest bit of sound or invasion of light could wake up.
>The pain coming back in full swing helped a bit too, just the time to take another dose of your handful of pills.
>As you slowly get up, you do your morning routine; shower, shave, shit, a quick check on your body parts, a visual one and a full diagnostic.
>You need to make sure everything is always in perfect condition; a small malfunction could essentially kill you.
>Before you start your diagnosis which will take around 10 minutes, you take your blade and your holster and attach it to your leg.
>You need to make sure every part of you is checked.
>Your little baby, a plasma blade manufactured especially for you certainly is a thing of beauty and a show of power and strength.
>You loved fighting personally rather than the typical meaningless and quick gunshots.
>You were no fool though, it is a no simple close distance sword.
>It had its own reactor similar to one you have in your leg, it was capable of slicing through almost any material no matter how hard, tough, hot or cold.
>When it cuts through things it is essentially using a powerful plasma that forces the atoms of said object to tear apart violently, like a small nuclear reaction at every point the blade touches.
>It also had the capability to extend the plasma a short distance and turning into various shapes and sizes, making it a viable weapon from a surprisingly large distance.
>It also had the ability to connect to your body while you held it, and feeding of your own power, making the blade even more powerful.
>During a real battle more than half of the available power would be consumed by the sword.
>To not make you just a simple target that was dealt with at range, the sword had an ace up its non-existing sleeve.
>It could extend its plasma field to absorb and destroy any object flying at you and harmlessly transfer all its kinetic energy through you to the ground.
>Another thing it could do was to redirect the object into any direction essentially deflecting it, the force was strong enough to actually send the object flying back at its shooter with immense more power behind it, be it bullet, a shell or other plasma weapons.
>You never really tried just how much it can handle mostly just using to absorb bullets, but you are pretty sure anything more powerful would just go through, or at least take a massive toll on your body.
>Using this… shield, also drains a lot of the energy quickly so its better to only use when needed.
>The handle was a blend of black and silver, with the blade itself being made from the same metal.
>Without any power the blade was absolutely useless and weak.
>However even though it consumed a lot of power to keep it constantly turned on, you did it anyway, you never knew when you needed it, and you sheath was special made to absorb its power in a cycle, while still draining power, it was a let less drastic and could be ready to use for a day or two, on its own reactor and maybe a week on your own.
>As you pull the blade out of the sheath, the entire room gets lighted up by the bright red plasma from the sword.
>The plasma itself had an incredibly strong and unstable glow, constantly changing shapes and emitting small red lightning strikes through all the air around it.
>It was essentially destroying everything around it at all times including the air.
>You gave it a few test swings, leaving a bright streak and smoke at every position it was in.
>You saw some glasses at the end of your room, you do a quick stab in its direction and in your mind, order it to extend so the tip just reaches the glass but not the wall behind it.
>Your mind was essentially connected to your entire cyborg body including the sword, even the sword itself had more computing power then any existing computer to date.
>Success, after retreating your sword, you can clearly see a sliced and melted glass, while everything around it was essentially untouched.
>The mad genius that constructed it got so much money and funding from you that he could essentially live off his entire life buying a car everyday and still have a lot to spare.
>You made him richer then even yourself.
>It took years to gather all the info, all the people and all the technology required, but in the end, it was all worth it.
>As you take pride in the piece of technology in your hands you try something more.
>You try turning the sword into your favorite weapon of fear.
>A giant fear-inducing scythe.
>In this mode the sword could only keep its shape for a couple of seconds, more than enough to slice through a big object cleanly.
>The swords starts glowing even brighter and the lightning and plasma extends into a vicious looking red scythe, just enough time for one swing before it retreats back into the original sword.
>You never needed any heater, one swing like this and entire room was like a sauna.
>Perfect, as you sit down and wait for the diagnosis to finish you think about what to do today.
>You setup the business to have a lot of free time to do whatever you want, you deserved it.
>You decided on getting information about your new wolf slave and maybe pay her a visit see how the training is going.

Chapter 8 - Sabrina

>After a few hours of looking up information and making a few calls you found out all you need.
>They were your partners, but you don’t keep a tab on everyone in your head so when you need some information you just research it.
>Apparently the family had a very successful, well-developed strategy and connections for a long time. They were trustworthy and cheap.
>Unfortunately the times changed, and they started to lose money and respect, so they changed strategies, apparently taking a more hands-on approach.
>You guess they overestimated how much control they have and made a certain individual very angry.
>You haven’t found any good information on their daughter though, apparently, she was home schooled, never had any real friends and stayed home pretty much all the time.
>The police got involved a couple of times as well but apparently everything got sorted out.
>Child abuse you guess.
>It’s as good time as ever to go and have a chat with Sabrina and then later see our poor abused girl.
>You get to the secluded area located in the basement of your mansion that was completely sealed off like a giant vault, it served as a nice prison and it did actually serve as a proper vault, although nobody needed to know that.
>The vault itself included a storage room, an office a more simplistic interrogation/training room and a hallway filled with cells which were to be simplistic and as uncomfortable as possible.
>They also differed in terms of quality, quality of living that is.
>From just a simple wooden bed and a toilet, to just brick walls and a small hole in the center.
>You wanted to make sure the prisoners and slaves knew their place.
>As of right now the only slaves you had were a very eager and enthusiastic cat that was ready to be sold, and was put into the nicest cell you have, the wolf girl and Sabrina.
>Sabrina herself was a really special case.
>Born to a poor family she was forced to live a life of prostitution.
>From when she was young she was though to only please and listen to commands.
>She sold her entire self to a big drug dealer a few towns away, essentially becoming a pet to him that did anything he ordered.
>The fucker however messed with your business and got punished for it.
>Sabrina however hated him and everyone else, so she begged to be with you and to keep her alive.
>You thrown into a cage and started to see how willing she was to go.
>You starved her, called her all the bad things you could imagine, force her to lick the dirt of your shoes even went as far as to do some minor torture.
>And she went through it all, did everything and without a single hint of hesitation.
>You loved that and gave her a nicer cell essentially making her the stress relief for when you had a bad day.
>She was a leopard with her proportions and looks being able to absolutely destroy any competition.
>You forced her to work out to keep healthy and her already big sized rack only added to her amazing qualities.
>With piercing green eyes, a very fluffy coat, long brown hair and the perfect amount of muscle to fat in all the right places.
>As more and more slaves started arriving many of them were in unusable condition, and you needed someone you can trust to take care of them, so you hired professionals to teach her and make her a simple doctor.
>Now her job is to be as slutty to you as she can, obey commands and make sure the slaves suffer but don’t die or pass out.
>Now you never really had sex with Sabrina or much of any sexual encounter at all, it just was not for you.
>You never felt the need to do it, or the urge to try, your teenage years were spent on the streets getting almost killed on a daily basis, you never really had time to really try any sexual things.
>And as you got here, you could not think of anything else other then a successful business, so you had no time for such thing, and even though your time became free over time you just did not care.
>What ended up happening is you, one the most powerful living creatures and certainly the most powerful human was… well… a virgin.
>As you open the door to the office, an always eager Sabrina is there waiting for you, expecting your arrival.
“Good afternoon master, our new puppy has already been put into her cell and the training began, I am sure that to someone as big and strong as you it will only take days for her to start begging for her to even see you”.
>Huh, she always knew how to make you smile, you give her a quick nod and ask how she is behaving.
>That’s when her smile falls a little bit and she becomes a little worried.
“Well master, to tell the truth, after she came back to her senses she hasn’t said a single word or even acknowledged any of our commands, I-I made sure they punished her as much as they and try to break her, b-but it seems she is well… used to it.”
>That’s new, usually there would be a little bit of protest, maybe you are paying them too much, or they need to be replaced.
>You ask her what they tried already, and how she reacted.
“Ever since she got here, she was kinda…. out of it, not responding, not eating and always in the corner crying.”
>That is to be expected when someone’s family is fucking killed you angrily tell the leopard.
>She winces and covers herself as she hears your raised voice then you can hear her begin to sob.
“ I a-am so sor-rry master, It’s just that she seems much more depressed than any other individual that I have seen.”
>she looks at you with pleading eyes.
“I just don’t want someone as important as you to worry about something like her.”
>You tell her to bring you to her now, you want to see eye to eye to this troublemaker once again.

Chapter 9 – The Trigger

>She brings you to the last cell of the hall, it is the one with brick walls and just a singular hole in the middle, only thing different from all the same repeated brick walls is the steel door.
>You immediately open the door and see the wolf for yourself sitting in the corner crying loudly.
>You furiously shout at her and pick her up with your human arm and forcing her into the wall.
>”I Have had enough of you being a impolite, depressed and sad looking fucking wolf, you hear me? You either start behaving and listening to commands or I am gonna make your life a living hell you understand you pathetic waste of oxygen?” You make sure you get your words across by punching the wall behind you with your other arm at the end of each sentence, the wall shattering covering her body with debris.
>Only now as she was held naked by the throat against the wall you notice her entire body and face covered by scars and various injuries, while you guessed some of them were from the car crash, the already started training, many of them were… old and very badly healed.
“I-I am not a wolf daddy, I-II am a just your nice and behaved dog, please don’t hurt me, please daddy no more.” 
>She just barely sputters out with the difficulty with breathing she has and through her obvious pain and tears.
>As you hear that your eyes go wide, you start to hear your heartbeat extremely loudly and it speeds up to abnormally high levels, you drop the wolf… no… dog and you feel you vision change as your past hits you over the head like a giant club that forces you to relive your past.

………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>Your childhood was one you don’t want anyone to ever experience, one that you would not wish to anyone to go through, it brakes a person, changes him.
>Your family never really liked you, it seemed like you were pretty much just an accident that nobody wanted.
>The friends you had never gave a shit about you or your problems and family told you to fuck of at every possible moment they could.
>Your father often came home drunk and relieved his stress by screaming at you and trying to find even a slightest thing you fucked up, so he can whip you as much as he wants.
>You tried to be a good child and always good to everyone around you, but soon you learned that you will never get back what you have given.
>Being enthusiastic answering question or being helpful to others only got you beat up and laughed at.
>You never found anything you wanted to do and anything you tried you got immediately laughed by your family or other people.
>You lived in the parts of a city that everybody looked at as the worst possible place to live.
>Filled with drugs, murders, psychopaths, child rapists and many more, you name a crime and it was probably done in a place just nearby.
>Days, weeks, months and years went by with you struggling to live through your depression, countless days of sleeping on the cold floor in the puddle of your own tears.
>Nobody to ever give you a hug or even a kind word to lift your mood.
>You never had anything to call your own, never a penny, you never tasted anything sweet, you never even showered or even took care how you look.
>One day you just had enough, you sneaked out of your room and grabbed a knife.
>You locked the door and only had one thing on your mind, suicide.
>Maybe the pain will finally go away, maybe you will finally find peace.
>As the knife stars tearing through your flesh you can’t help but cry.
>It was all interrupted by your door getting broken and your father stepping in.
>He saw what you did with a mortified expression… It was over.
>He gave you the worst beating of your life yet, you could not feel anything on your body, you could not cry harder.
>He only left you with the clothes you had on yourself and threw you out of the house on the rainy and cold streets.
>Through pain cold and misery you stumbled through the dark empty streets until you found yourself at a bus station.
>There was no one, completely empty with only a few empty benches protected from rain.
>You needed to hide from rain, you needed to lay down, so you went for it.
>The benches were cold and hard, but it was as good as it gets, and it relieved at least some of the pain you had, you tried to find the most comfortable position while curled up into a ball and tried dozing of for at least a little while.
>While you did manage to doze off for maybe an hour you were woken up by someone approaching.
“I had a really fucked up day today, so much fucking work, look at that fucker, life hates him anyways so let’s have some fun.” One said. “Fuck ye.” There were two of them.
>It was obvious from their voice that they were absolutely drunk, and as you opened your eyes and looked at them you saw that they were wearing a police uniform.
>What is gonna happen now? You though.
>You were not prepared for this though, they took out their batons and started beating you as hard as they could, was it legs, torso, arm or face they did not care.
>You tried covering, pleading but nothing it all felled to deaf ears.
>As you laid on the cold floor they had forced you into you just kept getting beat, they aimed at your face now.
>The blows kept coming and coming, never stopping, not amount of pleading or anything could help, it just would not stop.
>The pain was just coming and coming you felled blood in your mouth forming, teeth falling out, heard bones brake.
>Your vision finally began to fade, your body starting to become numb, but the pain never left.
>As you wake up, you think you are dead, this is it, you try moving and you worst fears became real, you are still alive, and the pain is back.
>You were laying in some kind of bush, you could not see out of one eye and you felled dried blood everywhere on your body. 
>Your felt pain in your chest after each breath and you felled most of your teeth were missing, somehow though you were alive, human bodies really are amazing, but at this time it was not amazing but a curse.
>As you laid in the somehow warm bush for a couple of hours, you decided its time to go, if you did not die yet there must be something you can do, it’s going to come eventually, and you at least want to stare into its eyes.
>As you walked through the back alleys you tried to find anything to help your injuries heal faster.
>You put your dislocated bones back to its place as best as you could, and used pieces of wood and any plastic to make a cast.
>Through digging around trash and streets you found many things.
>Discarded bottles of alcohols? Always has a little left at the bottom good for cleaning, Some old rags tissues? Good enough for a bandage.
>You soon found yourself a nice place in a dark alley behind a sushi restaurant.
>They always threw away old rice, vegetables, cut off end pieces of sushi and pieces of vegetables that could not be used, like pieces of cucumbers.
>You build a small shelter of the used napkins and boxes to have at least some kind of shelter and you fed off the food that was being thrown out, always being careful not to get spotted.
>This went on for a while and you begin to start looking less like a pile of bones.
>As you were enjoying a normal day eating a slight yellowish rice a similar policeman appeared, only this time alone.
“So, its you again huh? You survived, how pathetic, and you seem to be enjoying yourself stealing eh? This time I will not stop until your heartbeat stops”.
>You bolted to your cover behind a dumpster, you knew what is going to happen, no, not again.
>You looked around and saw a discarded and broken vacuum cleaner, the metallic tube could be useful, but were you able to do it?
>You had no time to think as he was right next to you his baton ready to strike, no time to think.
>You grabbed the tube and slammed him as hard as you could over the head, he seemed dazed but was still standing, so you repeat and repeat until the tube is nothing more, but bend metal and he is on the floor.
>You cannot run, if you run he will wake up and hunt you, he will kill you.
>Its you or him, this no game, no play on feelings, this is survival.
>You run to him and start punching his face, and you keep punching and punching.
>Your hand is bloody and hurts but you don’t stop, you cannot stop, you will not stop, not until he is no longer breathing.
>You keep punching and punching, his face no longer recognizable, his breath slow and unsteady.
>Not enough, you stand up and kick him more and more, you stand there and kick for at least a solid few minutes until you don’t hear anything, no sound, no breath and no heartbeat.
>What have you done? You just killed another living being, and it felt…. good.
>As you look at the bloody mess of your hand and his bloody mess once known as a face, you bolt it, you run, you go as fast as you can to who knows where.
>You run and run for what feels like hours, until you stop under a bridge and sit between the piles of trash.
>Who are you?
>What are you?
>What will you do in life?
>Nobody likes you.
>Nobody cares.
>None want to share their good fortune.
>None want to spread happiness.
>You will take it from them.
>You will take everything.
>You will have what I want.
>You will become strong.
>This was the tipping point, the day your life changed forever.
>You spend the next days working yourself to the death to become strong and feared, no longer cover in shadows and walk in shame, but walk with respect and power.
>Throw daggers with your eyes at all that dare to look at you in a bad way.
>You no longer beg for food, you take food.
>You would kill anyone who dared not to give you what you want.
>And so you did, first one was hard, then it was easier and easier.
>You stole money, bought clothe, weapons, food and proper shelter.
>You learned to fight, you learned to kill.
>People started noticing, through fear and interrogation you got into the drug business and learned how to make and cook drugs.
>For what you were capable of and what you did everybody had respect and you were feared.
>Contracts started rolling in for being an assassin, for tons of drugs, for protection, for being a mercenary.
>You finally had your own phone, house, car, money and most importantly respect and power.
>You finally got what you wanted, and things were going well.
>That is until one day it all came back at you like a truck in the oncoming lane.
>You came home and got assaulted by a guy in a mask.
>You fought but he had a knife and you had nothing, you fought you punched kicked, but for every kick you got a stab.
>And he stabbed you more and more, you felt nothing, only the warm blood rolling from each wound.
>You took the knife and sliced the throat of the attacker, and as you thought it was over another knock to your head from behind said otherwise, while you were still awake, you were helplessly on the ground.
And the attacker took the knife and resumed the stabbing.
>You were no longer able to stop it, you felt the coldness of death touching you at every part of your body the knife has struct.
>Blood filled your lungs and your mouth, you were not able to breath only spewing out blood.
>You felt it, you felt your own blood leave you at a rapid pace, the attacker hit your neck, that was the fatal one, your hearing snapped, and you heard nothing, your vision hazy, but you still felt the knife continue to invade your body.
>You did not move, you did not breath, but you still felt the knife and you still felt the horrible feeling of being stuck in your own body, in darkness, in emptiness, in the void.
>Soon the feeling of knife entering your body at various places stopped and so did the pain, so did any feelings of well… anything, and you were stuck in the darkness, empty, no emotion no thoughts, it was indescribable.
>Light, wait what? A light in the distance, its coming to you and fast.
>It hit you dead on like a giant bolt of lightning, and all of your body returned its senses almost immediately.
>Every part of your body, every single one of your senses screamed at once, and then... nothing.

……………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>You stand there before the dog girl, trembling, mouth open, eyes focused on a random point on the wall and your fist clutched and shaking.
>As you realize you are finally free from your flashback, you look at down at the curled-up girl that’s clearly awaiting punishment.
>You cannot say anything, do anything. 
>Sabrina told you she responded to nothing, not even talked, yet here she is before you, whimpering at just the sight of you.
>And she…. she makes remember your…. AGHHHH!!!
>You turn to the side and punch the wall as hard as you can, only this time using your right hand.
>The wall remains as is, except a sharp pain stars eroding.
>Still in shock and breathing heavily, accompanied by the sound of your loud and fast heartbeat as well as the tears of the certain girl.
>You examine your hand with total shock like it was the first time you ever saw blood.
>Your hand was guaranteed broken with several knuckles bleeding, one even coming as far as to start showing pure bone.
>You move to stand right in front of the girl, and clench your left fist to punish her for what she has done... only… you cannot.
>Your fist hangs in the air, but the punch just never comes.
>Somehow you cannot bring yourself to hurt her anymore… why.. .what is going on.
>You shout fuck at the top of your longs, your voice echoing through the entire room.
>You must leave this wretched cell immediately.
>A clearly shocked and concerned Sabrina is running towards you with questions such as; What happened master? Do you want me to do something? Oh no master, what happened to your hand?
>Amongst many others, showing a lot of concern, but at this point you just don’t give a fuck.
>All you do is just move past her not even acknowledging her existence.
>After the question don’t stop coming all you do is stop, not even turn or look in her direction and just quietly and slowly say:
>”Leave, me, the fuck, alone.”
>All you hear is a gasp and no longer hear any movement behind you.
>You slowly make your way to your room leaving a bloody trail behind, eyes staring at you, but not daring to ask and already petrified that they even dared to look.
>You go to your room and lay on your bed, your bloody hand soaking the covers.
>What the fuck just happened?

Chapter 10 – The Bigger They are, The Harder They Fall

>A week has passed, it dragged on and you were feeling very… weird.
>You kept getting flashback, dreams of your past, and in your head the murder of the so many that you killed.
>You tried working even harder, trying to find something else to thing about, go train some more slaves.
>The cat was sold for a very nice price and new ones kept coming, but you avoid any interaction with it for now because of that dog…
>There it is again you reminded yourself... good job.
>You were stressed out beyond belief and you wanted to get to the point of this.
>To get rid of your problems you must take a swing at the roots, you have to go see her again.
>Before that you asked for a report on things are going with her.
>Still no changes, refuses orders, takes punishment without any care and refuses to talk.
>Now you must know what to do, your mind speaks to you.
>She has huge potentional, the money she could be sold for could will be monstrous.
>It is but a test for you, to see how capable you are.
>And everyone be damned, you are going to prove that you will wrap her around your fingers and force her to be a pet no matter what you have to do.

……………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>You stand in front of the cell and gather your thoughts on how you should approach, for this very rare time, violence won’t work.
>She is sick in the head, abused and tolerant, you are going to have to break her in a different way.
>As you open the cell door, she doesn’t even care to look who approaches, just sits in the middle of cell staring at the wall.
>That is until you stand in front of her and she realizes it’s you.
>She immediately crawls into a corner, covers into a ball clutching her tail and stars crying.
“No please I am sorry, I will be good, I promise, just no more.”
>What?
>You read the reports, during the week your crew tried everything to get her to talk to even show a slight bit of pain and nothing.
>Now by just the sheer sight of you she is desperately crying and scared to death.
>Well you are scary and all, that’s what you go for… but really? That much?
>You don’t need to move a hand, to raise a voice, you are sure that just by a snap of your fingers she would do anything and more just from the fear.
>You are stuck, this has never happened, what is wrong with her?
>And why do you not like this?
>A slave already this scared from you doing pretty much nothing is the dream come true for someone as you.
>Yet you don’t do not feel proud or good.
>Just… ugh, you cannot describe it.
>Curious? Confused?
>Nothing comes to mind
>You walk up to her, crouch down and take in her every detail.
>Her fur is gray black and white mixed together in a similar pattern to that of a wolf, although you know she is not a wolf, she said so.
>Why do you trust what she said?
>Ugh… now is not the time to question yourself.
>She has a curiously black, long and fluffy tail that she is holding on for dear life.
>Her fur is very long and thick, also very dirty and filled with large amount of uncomfortable looking knots.
>There is still bits of dried blood, and even more scars scattered everywhere.
>She is also very malnourished but its hard to tell through all the fur
>Her breasts are averaged sized which was not very favorable to her price value, but you knew she would shine in other ways.
>through the closely held tail in her face she just briefly moves it and looks at you.
>Her face is a big mix of different kinds of gray with the lower end of her muzzle a pure white.
>Her teary brown eyes staring directly into yours.
>You see your reflection in them and see the pain she was through.
>There is this incontrollable itch in your right hand to just… move it and touch her.
>You have no idea what is going to you or why, you are so confused and dumbfounded that you just oblige.
>She notices your hand approaching and immediately hides her face while releasing even more tears.
>She tries to hide and make herself as small as possible.
>As your hand gets closer and closer you finally touch her shoulder.
>She stars making a lot of really sad sounding noises, uncontrollably shaking and starts screaming all kinds of things like.
“No, please. I am sorry. I will be a good girl. Please forgive me.”
>You are confused and horrified at your actions and at what you are doing.
>You immediately and quickly stand up and just bolt, and smash the cell door behind you.
>You feel your legs become heavy, so you lean against the door and start sliding to the ground until you are eventually sitting.
>This is not you, this is not right, why is she controlling you.
>Are you that weak?
>No, there is must be another explanation.
>She is just big test, yes, a test.
>Just a test, a test, you are strong, you are the best, she will not break you.
>You will break her.
>You must.
>As you continue just thinking on what to do with yourself while staring at the wall, you notice Sabrina walking in from around the corner
>She notices you sitting and looks to be very confused about how she should react, obviously knowing if she says or does something wrong she will get severely punished.
>AHHHH… but why would she get punished for what…. for helping you? For being concerned?
>You don’t know who you are anymore.
>You just calmly tell Sabrina to go to her office.
>What can you do now? Will now other start thinking you are getting soft?
>You are not soft…. right?
>You slowly stand up and make your way to your bedroom.
>You bump into random objects on the way, seemingly blind by your own thoughts.
>As you finally reach the bed and sit on it you are just not sure what to do or to think.
>You take a look at your arm, thankfully it was not broken after the incident, but it was dislocated, and it probably is going to leave nasty scars.
>You lay on the bed taking the pills and starting your machine to recharge and refill your reactors.
>You lay on the bed for hours.
>It is probably very late in the morning, a good time to sleep as ever.
>But you cannot sleep, you cannot force your mind to put you into sleep, it was programmed that if certain criteria are not met it will not induce sleep as kind of a safety mechanism to prevent random acts of forced sleep.
>Through all this though you realize one thing.
>The interaction you had was so… unexplainable you completely ignored all the pain you constantly have.
>Are you still the same person?
>Is it still you in there, in the shell of a body you currently are riding in.
>Do you even deserve all this that you have when something as pathetic as her can damage you this much?
>You are not sure how to answer that.
>You hook up to a computer and tell all the sleep safety mechanisms to fuck off and knock you out.
>At least that works, and you feel yourself begin to lose your vision as sleep overtakes your body.

Chapter 11 – Is This All That’s Life Has To Offer?

>The pain coming back in full swing wakes you up.
>There is nothing that holds it back and this time it was way stronger than ever before.
>You downed triple the usual number of pills in the vain hope of it leaving.
>After a while it set down to a reasonable level you were able to do your everyday routine.
>You spend all morning preparing yourself for another visit to the dog girl.
>You make sure this time she will not break you, and you will break her.
>No surprises this time, no fucking triggers or any kind of shit.

………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>You spend the next months personally making her be obedient and mannered.
>You learned she is smart but its like some of the normal things everyone learns are missing.
>Her training is not like that of a normal slave.
>She does not respond to violence to screaming or to anything usual.
>She is like a wild animal, you gotta make her trust you and become your pet.
>So that’s what you do, you start calling her by her name and teach her many things she never knew what it was like a small puppy.
>You cannot help but confess that you were actually starting to like training her.
>She was unlike any other anthros or human you ever seen.
>She was exactly like a finest slave should be.
>Except you did not have to teach her, to force her to be one.
>She already was like that, you just had to build up trust.
>You knew she was special and that she was going to make you a lot of money.
>But she was a goldmine, she was the perfect slave, the perfect pet.
>There was another auction coming up and you had a bunch of slaves ready to go, along with Claudia as the special one, you hyped the event for days, many of the highest rollers and the richest creatures from all over the world got interested.
>The auction was just in a few days and you were personally training Claudia.
>You told her she was going to go places very soon and going to make you her master very happy and rich.
“What do you mean master? Going where?
>You normally… not normally, you never talk to your slaves like this at all.
>Everyone, absolutely everyone was weirded out by what happened to you and how you are acting.
>But you were sure to literally beat the look and questions out of them assuring its all just for the business, and it was after this you will not have to do anything for years, she is going to be the highest sold piece of merchandise ever.
>Rich anthros and humans pay crazy amount of money for behaved slaves and she was more than that, she was perfect.
>You usually teach your slaves or tell your crew to teach the slave how to properly please a man or woman, but you knew Claudia never had this experience and wanted to keep it this way.
>Its one of the reasons she was so hyped up for the auction.
>A broken dog girl, perfectly obedient, a pet unlike any other, absolutely no knowledge about the topic of sexuality, not one thing she would refuse to do.
>As you were sitting in the room looking at Claudia while she studied and learned cooking.
>You were no longer in the same cell, but a room that is much more friendly and comfortable looking, but still preventing anyone from getting out of it.
>Since the auction was so soon, Claudia was perfectly groomed, showered and cleaned with the most expensive of shampoos and conditioners.
>She was also normally fed and given proper exercise.
>As she finally finished cooking her first proper meal, a lasagna she beamed with excitement.
“I did it master. My first actual meal, please try it!”
>You could not help but comply to give it a try, it did look delicious after all.
>The last couple of months you gotta admit, you did become soft and different.
>But you did not care.
>You felt good and you had the biggest pile of money just in front of you, nothing could go bad.
>As you take a spoon of the lasagna and chew it up you realize.
>This is beyond amazing.
>You for some reason tell her that with an actual smile on your face…. wait.
>A smile… you smiled, you were genuinely happy, how?
>Your thoughts get interrupted by the most craziest thing happening since the day you have woken up in this world.
>You are embraced by Claudia in a hug.
“Thank you master, all I ever want to do is just to make you proud and happy.”
>Time freezes, everything freezes.
>You have never been hugged, you have never hugged anyone, and you are pretty certain neither did she.
>The pain in your body just… leaves, replaced with the feeling of warmness and comfort.
>You cannot help but to give in to the hug and hug her back.
>She is incredibly soft and warm, and you see her tail wagging at an incredible speed.
>What is this?
>This feeling.
>You.
>You just.
>You just don’t know what to say, or to do.
>Claudia looks directly into your eyes then she snaps and quickly becomes worried and scared.
“I ugh… umm… I am so sorry master.” 
>She quickly jumps off you and sits in the opposite corner of the room.
“I don’t know what got over me, please forgive me.”
>She looks super worried with her tears starting to form.
>You are too dumbfounded to even start breathing again.
>Until you are forced to of course, with that waking you up a little you just reply that its okay and make your way to your bedroom locking her cell.
>It was much nicer, but it was still a cell she was your property after all.
>You reach your room and plop yourself on the bed, with that weird weird feeling again.
>Huh, déjà vu.
>It’s going to be over soon though; the auction is soon, and you are going to get so much money from her.
>That’s what this was all about, all the hard work you spend with her… you are going to be even more richer then you were, not just the most powerful man but the most wealthiest man.
>Its what you always wanted in life right? 
>Wealth and power… yeah that’s it… what else is even in there left in life besides that?
>That’s all that life has to offer right?

Chapter 12 – The Deal

>This is it, the day of the auction.
>The place was personally hosted in one of the largest auditoriums in the city.
>All of the most powerful and richest man from around the country were all here.
>But not a single one that had no intention of buying or spending.
>This was a place of big spenders, to say the security was tough would be an understatement.
>But someone like you went through without a second glance.
>You brought all of the slaves you had, with Sabrina being the one that showed anyone around should they find interest in what you offer.
>This was unlike any normal auction, there was no screaming bigger and bigger numbers.
>Each slave had a number and a current price below it.
>Should you be interested you notified the number and the price changed to how much you were willing to place.
>You could also choose to talk with the owner for a insta-buy.
>You were regarded as a very professional and good trainer, so all of your current slaves went for a pretty high price already, but your ace… Claudia…. Was still not available to bid on.
>It was a lot better to leave her for later where all the big spenders would start throwing cash around after having a lot to drink.
>This place of course had drinks and food everywhere, the biggest and best chefs were hired to bring a piece from every cuisine from Japanese, Chinese, to Italian or even American.
>You wanted a burger with fries? No problem.
>You wanted sushi? No problem.
>You wanted a lobster covered in the most expensive caviar? Ehh sure why not.
>The more famous you were the more attention you got.
>Meaning the more drinks and food you had essentially.
>You being only one of the two humans here was pretty famous.
>But you did not come to eat or drink, so you refused all offers.
>The day went by moderately fast, all kinds of famous people you did not expect to be here taking a gander at your merchandise.
>Some even bidding, one even offered three times the price for one particular lizard that caught their eye.
>Let’s just say you already made millions and yet the big finale still awaits.
>As the day turned into night the biggest auctions started taking place.
>The big screen around the place served as advertisements payed by the sellers to gather the most attention.
>You did not need that, everyone already knew what you had left thanks to your excellent marketing team.
>However, you could not feel good about what was going to happen, you felt strange.
>It was like something in your head kept trying to barge in and say something yet the wall it was behind was too strong.
>You wonder what it wants.
>As the night goes by you take a walk around your cells, all empty except one.
>The last one.
>You can see a very upset and confused Claudia sitting on the chair.
>You insisted on her having clothes this time around.
>Not that you were getting sympathy… it just added to the value… right?
>You looked directly into her eyes and she looked into yours, she gave a slightest hint of smile towards you.
>You could not help but give it back… but why… she was going to get sold today and make you in the high millions, so why the gestures.
>Your head is playing games and you know it, must not get distracted.
>The official bidding on her has started and your little room gets filled with the most drunken and powerful anthros.
>They are bidding furiously, she is already at sixteen million and climbing.
>You are begging to feel really bad, a feeling you cannot explain, like a dagger taking a stab at your heart.
>And you knew this was no simple feeling, pain was your life and yet this sharp one was unlike any other.
>It was not pain, it was much worse, it was like something was struggling to get out.
>You took a glance at Claudia through the wall of anthros and the cell doors, mistake.
>The feeling rose even higher with you not being able to stand anymore.
>The excited Sabrina standing next to the cell explaining what Claudia has to offer immediately saw you and excused herself to your side.
“Master are you okay? Do you need some water?”
>This girl always cared about you so much, you never understood why though, I guess your training really is good.
>You tell her everything is fine, just that you are getting rich really quickly that’s all.
>She does not seem too content with the answer, but she knows its her que to leave.
>As she turns around, you get up and stop her by putting a hand on her shoulder.
>You have never done this, ever even showed a slight bit of care or touch.
>She turned around her face being the maximum amount of confused you have ever saw, and a hint of fear.
“Mast….”
>Before she even stars you say just one thing, you have to, the feeling won’t let go… you must.
>You tell her to…. Tell her to… bid fifty million on her.
“But master she already…”
>You once again cut her off with just one word…. Please.
>This confused her even more, yet her fear was replaced with… understanding?
>You say to her its to raise her value of course.
“Of course master, that is going to be no problem at all”
>She says with a smile.
>Why the smile? You know it’s for the value… it must be.
>The big bid immediately puts everyone into a shock.
>They all start leaving, and you just realize what you have done.
>As the entire room gets empty, you start to panic.
>That’s when the door opens, and a very strange creature walks in
>You right away realize it’s a he.
>He had a big trench coat, a big hat, gloves and black glasses.
>Basically you could not tell who or what he was.
>He took a glance at Claudia for just a few seconds than sat down in front of you.
>He took of his hat and glasses and now you could see who he was.
>A human, just like you.
>Except… his face... it was… wrong.
>That’s when you saw his eyes which prompt you to study his face features more closely.
>He was a cyborg… just like you.
>Except, he was no simple half cyborg, both of his eyes were cybernetic, his entire face replaced with a skin colored flexible metal.
>He had no hair, instead he had very noticeable bolted on plates like armored plating on a tank.
>His eye were a deep blue, with a striking resemblance to one of your own, his face though was clean of any discolored streaks or wires unlike your own.
“We finally meet Anon.”
>His voice was pure mechanical, with no emotion behind it.
“My name is Keith, and I would be very much interested in your… merchandise.”
>This all seems too suspicious and bad, but you have had talks like this many times in the past, you know to show fear would to lose dominance and you will not let that happen.
>You raise your mechanical hand to shake and tell him you are very honored to meet him.
>As he raises his hand to shake you clearly see he has a mechanical hand as well, except a lot bigger and armored.
>As you shake he squeezes with enough power to shatter any bone or metal, not your hand though and you squeeze back, the sound of pressure could be heard very loudly as you stare each other in the eyes.
“Shaking with a left hand is very bad manners Mr. Anon.”
>You tell him you knew who you had the honor to be with, so you tell him it was a lot more friendly to shake metal to metal.
“I see, well then let’s talk business. I don’t go to many of these silly auctions, but your girl over there shows a lot of potentional and fun if you know what I mean.”
>You definitely do, and you anger stars to rise, you guess you like her more then you dare to admit.
“Claudia was it eh? Very nice name, I would like to offer you a pretty huge sum of money for her.
I can see she is already going for… what was it? Fifty million eh? Seems someone is eager, my offer a hundred million on the spot.”
>You freeze, that’s a lot, like a lot a lot.
>But you feel like you wouldn’t be just getting money, you would lose something, and you never lose something.
>This… Claudia… what was she to you?
>A toy? A slave?
>You are unsure, so you repeat it all in your head, all the laughs the smiles… the hug.
>Your heart the throbbing, the feeling, its… too much, you cannot, you must not, you will not sell her.
>You tell him you are sorry, but she is not up for debate anymore, not for sale.
“Ohhh I see, you want her for yourself huh?”
>You tell him no way, just that you sold her to a very personal client that you would hate to disappoint and ruin good relationship and partnership.
>He laughs very heavily, then gets serious and close to your face.
“You see Anon, I don’t play around, I will give you three hundred plus a partnership with me, what do you say? With our power in the crime business combined we could have a monopoly.”
>You can see his man behind him approach him and warn him, he just pulls out a gun and shoots one in the face, making the other shut up immediately.
“So, what do you say Anon? Isn’t this all you ever wanted? Power and money, come on then, don’t make me wait, I hate waiting.”
>Now what? You are offered what you always wanted, power and money.
>All that you ever wanted, all that you ever strive to achieve, all the time and effort you spend.
>And all that could be done with just one shake.
>But is it really that simple?
>Claudia showed you so much in such a short while, maybe money and power is not all that is left out there?
>You heard of this feeling somewhere, you heard people care about each other… like each other.
>But how could this happen to you?
>So many you killed and tortured never wanting money or power, just… someone to hold, to cry on….
>Just like you, when you were young.
>The flashbacks are back.

……………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>You are in your room.
>Currently crying on your bed.
>Why was the life so cruel to you?
>You just want someone, just one person to hold you.
>To tell you he or she cares.
>A shoulder to cry on.
>A smile to brighten your mood.
>A joke to lift your mood.
>With tears flooding your eyes and an unsteady step you go towards the kitchen.
>You take out a sharp knife and carefully and quietly go back to your room
>You lock the door, and sit in your hopefully last every position.
>You take your knife and put it over your hand, that’s how they do it right?
>As you are about to put the knife in your flesh, you just pray in your mind to anyone out there.
>All you want is someone to lean against, all you want is someone to care, all you want.
>Is a hug.

…………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>An angry voice wakes you up.
“One last try Anon, otherwise the deal is over.”
>No, no deal, you are done.
>You were so blind all these years, so blinded by your own self.
>Blinded by hatred, by anger, by loneliness.
>You became what you feared so long ago.
>And all you ever wanted and needed stared at you through a cage nearby.
>Not anymore, no more, you are done, you are going to set things right.
>You stand up and get close to his eyes and whisper that she is NOT for sale.
“I see, very well Anon, you just made a grave mistake todays and I will remember it, enjoy this bitch of yours.”
>When he leaves you tell everyone you are leaving, asap.

……………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>It is going to take a long while before anything gets carried, so you decided to go first letting your crew take care of the rest.
>You wait until everyone is gone from the room and you get the key from the cell to open the cell door.
>You see a sad looking Claudia sitting in the corner.
>As she hears and sees you entering she immediately stars getting happy and comes running to you, except she stops just before you with an embarrassed expression.
>This time however you are the one who hugs her.
>You once again feel her incredibly soft and fluffy fur.
>Her warmth, her breathing and her heartbeat is all that you can feel and hear, and it’s the best feeling you could ever hope for.
>You tell her you are so sorry for everything you have done, and you are going to put this right.
“What do you mean master? You are the best thing that has ever happened to me, you have nothing to apologize for.”
>You carefully tighten the hug and tell her you are a horrible person and you are sorry for so many things you have done, but for now we have to leave, and to stop calling you master, you are Anon to her and always will be.
>As you turn to go, you see a teary-eyed Sabrina standing there.
“I uhh… umm.”
>You tell her its okay, and that you are not mad, you tell her sorry as well, but not to tell this to anyone.
>You trusted Sabrina and you knew she wouldn’t betray you.
“Thank you master…”
>Its Anon you interrupt.
“Thank you Anon, you have no idea how happy I am to see you like this, I knew you always were a good man.”
>You tell her to come with you, we are going home.
>You also tell her she has been promoted, and no more slave business or much of any business, but it’s going to take time, a lot of time.
>And a lot of talks and deals to make sure there are no loose ends.

Chapter 13 – The Lost End Goal of Life

>You take a seat as a driver in your car, with Claudia being next to you and Sabrina in the back.
>The ride was pretty quiet and uneventful except the one moment where your hand touches Claudia’s hand and for the rest of the journey you held hands.
>When you came home, you immediately found a new and comfortable room for Sabrina to sleep in and rest, for your effort you got a very big smile and a hug from the happily jumping and excited leopard.
>After that you take a hold of Claudia’s hand and make your way to your bedroom.
>After sitting down and motioning Claudia to do the same you look her into eyes and say how sorry you are about what you have done and to so many other.
>You cannot help but start to get teary-eyed and continue on saying that you are just a broken image of who you once were when you were young
 “Don’t worry Anon, I know. But believe me when I say you helped me so much too.”
>You? Help? All you ever did was torture all even her, you taught her like a pet, like someone without rights, you are so disgusted at yourself.
 “Don’t worry about that, you don’t know what I went through, all that you did to me just showed me what I missed in life.”
>Don’t worry? You only took advantage of her behavior for your own selfish needs, you promise that you will repair your mistakes and show her all that life has to offer, but you are afraid you may be lost yourself.
>You look away from Claudia’s beautiful eyes and begin to doubt yourself even harder than ever before.
>Is this happening too fast?
>Just so little ago you haven’t felt much, now it is all going so fast, you hope this feelings are real, that her feelings are real.
>You get an idea, you tell her in order for her to understand and for you to take this pain of your chest, you must explain your story, you ask her if she will let you do that.
>She envelopes you in a hug from behind nuzzling into your neck.
“Of course you can, please if it helps, go ahead. I got my own story to tell as well, so if you will listen then I will listen.” 
>So this is how it feels when someone cares huh?
>You begin telling her your entire life story, ending with your death in the human world.
>Through the story Claudia started hugging you even more tightly and crying on your shoulder, you cannot help but feel amazing letting all this out to someone who really cares, to finally have that shoulder to cry on that you so desperately needed, and you cannot help but lean your head on hers and hold one of her hands in your right one feeling her incredibly soft and amazing fur, while you did not see her, you could feel her smile.
>You tell her that you are afraid that is not the end of it, you still haven’t told her about what you did when you have awakened in this world.
“You don’t have to Anon, you already poured your heart and feelings onto me, and I am very grateful, nobody ever showed me so much care like you do Anon, my master.”
>You can’t help but turn around, look once again into those shining orbs of hope and scratch her behind the ears which ears a giggle that sounds like it came from an angel itself, it had the calming and warm effect that is so hard to describe, yet so amazing to feel.
>You could spend the rest of eternity in her embrace, but it wouldn’t feel right without her knowing all you had to hide.

………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>Something cold and hard awakes you from your sleep.
>You feel yourself laying on a floor, somehow you get a feeling it’s the same floor, did you not die?
>You try to get up only to be amazingly surprised.
>Aside from a huge headache, dizziness and muscle cramps, you are. fine?
>You take a quick look around, its hard because your vision is incredibly blurry and kinda… colorless.
>But as you wipe aways your eyes and continue trying to focus your vision returns to normal… too normal, wait you see… depth?
>Before you even realize where you are you are shocked by realizing your body is completely healed, no broken bones, no scars not even any injuries.
>So you must have died, there is no other way.
>Hmm, you thought death would be different, feel different and hurt a lot less, you guess beggars cant be choosers.
>With another this time focused look around you notice you are in some kind of a back alley, surround by trash, again huh?
>You get up and try to find a weapon, you were just murdered and now are apparently healed and in a back alley, you need a weapon.
>You find a piece of old wood with some nails on it, not very effective but good enough.
>As you examine the piece of wood you hear something behind you.
“Hey is someon….”
>Before he finished you spin around and smash him over the head with the wood, you knew better then to look, moment of surprise is key to survival.
>He fell backwards instantly, only now as he was falling you realize one thing… he is not… human?
>As you look at his sleeping body on the ground you notice you apparently broke his… muzzle.
>A dog? A …. Human…ish… dog?
>What in the fuck?
>You quickly check his pockets and see the normal thing you would expect a human would have.
>A key, a wallet some money.
>Except all of it is… different, money you didn’t recognize and born in a country you never heard of.
>Also a picture of his… family you guess.
>All of them dogs… wow.
>Either heaven is a cruel joke or that reincarnation bullshit is right.
>You decided to take a look around.
>As you stepped onto the actual street you see a street similar to yours, except some details are different, more… modern.
>The cars were still cars but a lot of them were quiet… electric probably.
>But too many, you thought technology has not come that far to make them reasonably priced and actually good for daily use but there is so many of them.
>Oh right, different world or maybe you just slept in a coma for a very long time and a lot of crazy shit happened.
>Days passed, and it took a long time to adjust to all this crazy new things and… anthros as the called themselves.
>To your surprise the residence here were much more friendly and open then what you are used to, so as you returned to your old ways of salvaging anything you could find people actually helped, but you were no fool, you learned to be careful of such actions.
>So you did what you did best, you have stolen, you have intimidated, you have brought fear.
>Soon you learned more of this world, and of the fact you are not the only human here, although humans were rare there certainly was a decent amount of them.
>No matter, you needed to kick start your life again, thankfully drugs in this world were unseen, so there was no law prohibiting it, so you could quickly gather resources and start producing and growing.
>First it was the cheapest and unpurest blend of chemicals you could find and mix together for a decent effect.
>The level of stupidity in these anthros was incredibly, through sheer fear you could force them to buy it from you.
>You gave those who were sad, depressed, homeless or in other bad shit a taste, a free sample.
>One free sample is nothing, they are going to keep coming forever back, the magic of drugs.
>Funds started rolling in as the number of your victims started climbing fast.
>The poor got poorer the rich will get richer, and if you don’t have enough to pay, you will still pay, with your life.
>You had no mercy, never did or will, and that word soon spread.
>Your old job of a mercenary and an assassin soon came back.
>This world was so innocent, it was almost sad, but the money in your pockets said so otherwise.
>After you got a house and all the needed things such as: a car, a phone, proper clothes and weapons, things really started to accelerate.
>Mass production, hiring and teaching of many new members.
>You became a leader of a crime syndicate in a time that would make the biggest criminal heads of your world jealous.
>You also learned of this world and its advancement on technologies, apparently as the humans started appearing so did technology.
>A new thing was on a rise, the so-called augmentations.
>A editing of the genes or a straight up upgrade on the biological parts of your body replaced by the superior mechanical magical shenanigans.
>You were of course interested and after months of business and searching and lots, lots of many different contacts you met a genius behind so many of the advancements.
>A human such as yourself that calls himself The Doctor.
>With minor persuasion you found out he got into this world similarly to like you did, except he was from a much later date then you.
>He said he was interested in technology and was an engineer combined with a unhealthy amount of knowledge in medicine back in his world.
>While he was no were near a genius of his time, the technology was so advanced that the things he brought here were basic things to his world.
>The technology he brought was not created by him, only a replica of what he has seen, he did not tell this to anyone… except you, you had your ways of making people talk of course.
>But he was not afraid, he was amused actually, a classic mix of crazy, excited and genius.
>You made a deal, you will shower him with wealth and in return he will make you the strongest there is.
>He showed you what he had available, and he showed you a experimental replica of an plasma sword.
>You did as you promised, and brought him wealth beyond his dreams and he has set you a date on his operation table.
>All those who knew did not approve of what you were about to do but they were promptly silenced.
>Back in your world much of now functioning body was broken, there was nothing to, lose only to gain.
>You ordered half of your body to be completely replaced, the doctor was skeptical but this you let the money do the talking.
>You will become a blend of technology and muscle.
>The operation soon came, it took agonizing weeks, just laying on a table, still conscious, hooked on so many needles and machines.
>Instead of eating the energy you needed was brought directly into your blood stream, during all the time you were bound to the tables with straps that refused to let you move even the tiniest bit.
>It was the worst pain you felt in your life, and it never stopped, and you could not do anything to stop it.
>The Doctor knew what he was doing and took no sympathy in your pain.
>Pumping you of even more chemicals to put you in sleep was out of the question, so was pain relief.
>You were already full of things that were never supposed to enter your body.
>After what felt like eternity, you were finally set free.
>You looked in a mirror to see what you have become.
>Like a monster stitched together, a blend of metal and flesh.
>Your organs, immune system, nerves and everything interconnected with the machine.
>To say it took weeks to even adjust to the feeling was an understatement.
>You pretty much lived with the doctor for months to repair all faults and make sure everything is going as it should.
>The pain never stopped, and according to the doctor it never will, a price to pay for power.
>Your nervous system was connected with the machines own, sending too many signals to your head.
>Your brain itself was connected with a computer to make sure it really is a part of you.
>Your body of course refused to cooperate and send all its available resources to destroy.
>Your body will forever fight with itself and basically tries to self-destruct.
>You have to take a constant supply of medicine and chemicals to keep you alive.
>The reactor itself that you have gotten needs to be refueled too, basically making you a slave to the doctor, as if he dies or refuses to work for you, you were as good as dead.
>So there was no other way but to give him most of your wealth hoping he will stay loyal.
>Your new body functioned above what any other living thing could even hope for.
>Superhuman speed and strength, impenetrable armor, immune to diseases and viruses.
>Before the operation begone you insisted on still staying somewhat human, you kept your organs and half of your human self.
>The organs were useless, your mechanical body doing all the work, but the beat of a heart is something that you want to stay with you forever, as losing that would mean losing the last piece of your humanity.
>This was not enough, you could still be shot and killed, you knew this and still refused to be fully mechanical.
>You asked the doctor about the plasma blade and its properties.
>He showed you what it can do, and you loved it.
>A weapon exceeding all those before it, able to protect from ranged weapons and destroy any melee ones.
>With these new upgrades you became even more stronger than ever before.
>After a long time you finally arrived back to your business, you had a new goal, to make more money, you need a monopoly, you need to destroy all competition.
>You need to put fear into all.
>With your new powers this was an easy task and your business soon grown exponentially.
>You gathered so many new business, and swallowed almost all competition.
>Technology in the world however sped up and soon you were not the only cyborg out there, still the most advanced but now there were too many threats and your execution could be made much more simple.
>You decided to lay back a little, enjoy what you have.
>You had business in many parts of the crime syndicate such as drugs, mercenaries and even slave trade.
>The slave trade was a new thing that powerful and rich people payed millions for.
>Your ruthless tactics and fear made all those you captured just a puddle of slime under your feet.
>Needless to say, your slaves were taught like pets and became the most well know for being high quality and obedient.
>Then the day everything changed came, a certain wolfdog girl appeared.
>She changed something in you, you saw yourself in her.
>You seen your past flash before your eyes.
>You realized the mistakes you made, the fear, the destruction and the horror you have brought.
>You are the one that all the evil in this world is to be blamed for, a true devil incarnate.
>Seeing this wolfdog… Claudia… brought change into you, like a needle of hope striking you deep in the skull.
>You remember your past, what you have been through.
>You realized that you were missing something, something important yet you did not know what.
>A hug, a shoulder to cry on, someone that cares.
>She showed you that you are beyond redemption and can only pray and hope to get forgiveness.
>She is the most amazing thing you have seen, so damaged, so sad, so depressed, so lonely.
>Like a mirror image to who you once were until the devil knocked on your door and shaped you into what you are.
>You just want to leave the past, to start a new one, to live… happy and without pain, without fear, without doubt.
>To make another happy instead of yourself.
>You never could make yourself truly happy, because real happiness comes from giving and not taking, to give is like to receive the biggest reward, to see someone happy through your effort is a gif that keeps on giving and never stops feeling good.
>You just hope, you wish that she will feel the same.
>That she will not be afraid.
>Because you don’t want her, she is unlike a thing you can get because you want it.
>She is something you need desperately to leave your old past behind.
>Without her, you are truly… dead.

………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>You say the last part with closed eyes and as the last sentence finishes leaving your mouth, you open your eyes to see Claudia leaning in.
>You lean in without hesitation, close your eyes and kiss the teary-eyed but very happy wolfdog.
>The kiss is something you cannot describe with human words, or with any language or sounds.
>Nothing you ever did, or experience could show how much passion was behind it.
>How good it felt, how nothing else in the world mattered but you and her at this moment in time and space.
>There was no experience behind the kiss, it was as amateur and bad as it gets, but that did not matter.
>At this moment and forever more there will never ever be anyone or anything that would do better than her.
>You did not want this moment to end, ever.
>While you have never done this, you begin to feel you want more, so you slip in your tongue into her eager awaiting mouth.
>She lets you in and you begin to explore her mouth and play with her tongue.
>Like a little dance you wrestle with her while still having your eyes closed.
>The moment lasts for what feels like ages, and you slowly being to pull away, as you needed to take a breath of the life-sustaining oxygen.
>Curse you lungs for being so weak and running this moment.
>A string of clear saliva is all that’s left between the two of you showing just how intimate it all was.
>You wish you could tell something to her to explain, to tell just how that felt, but you are not able to come up with anything and probably just look extremely shocked, amazed and lustful all rolled into one face expression.
>She looks at you with even more tears leaving her beautiful brown eyes, only this time they are the tears of happiness, you also get another one of those angel-like giggles confirming how stupid your face must look right now.
“Neither have I… I don’t know what to say to you, you are… you are just amazing, I don’t want to ruin this moment, but I must tell you my story too, it would just not be fair, and please don’t think I am telling this to you because I want sympathy or be treated differently, I just want you to know who I really am, just like I now know you.”
>As the sentence is spoken her words became more and more quiet, you know she is worried, and you cannot and will not let that ever be the case.
>You take the lead and surprise her with another passionate but this time a rather quick kiss.
>You tell her its only fair and you are here to listen and always will.
 “Thank you.”

………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

“I was raised as an only child born in a normal small house.
My father was almost always away, meanwhile my mother was angry all the time and spend days crying and screaming.
I heard her every time and she knew this.
She always used to discipline me whenever I even dared to say one word back after she ordered me to do something.
When Father came home he was almost constantly drunk and fought with my mother, there were a lot of screams and sometimes weird sounds coming from their room. 
Father had a routine that whenever he came home after a particularly bad day he always used to use me as a sort of a punching bag, while there was beating he never did just straight up punch me, the word punching bag is meant as a symbolism. 
He used to shout at me and scream at me, after which he started to order me to do simple things for him which always amused him. 
Growing up I was not allowed to go outside or talk to anyone not even the mailman or the occasional delivery guy when father was too pissed or drunk.
As I got older, mother started to teach me various subjects and given me books to read. 
While now I know she was too harsh on me I know deep in my heart she meant well and so did my father.
She did spend a lot of her time teaching me many things like how to read, speak other languages, biology, geography, math and many more. 
When I was very obedient and did everything that I was ordered to do, I was allowed to go shopping with a list of what there was needed to get from mother, whenever father was home he always used to add something extra for himself. 
There were times where he wanted beer or cigarettes, a lot of the time the shopkeeper wouldn’t let me buy it, so I had to try and figure out a way to get around that by asking strangers. 
It got me into a lot of trouble that I barely managed to escape from, but if I didn’t buy what father ordered his punishment would be quite severe. 
When I was 16, father helped my mother to teach, I learned how logistics and many businesses work, I studied law and economics, or well I read a lot of books about it.
Soon I was making my family proud, my father gave me many tasks which only later on I found were actual business transactions. 
I became an actual worker for the company to repay my debt to my family for raising me. I dare to even say I was very good at it. 
However, the day that changed all came. 
I was working on a project using a computer my father had given me, it was heavily restricted on what you could access but I actually found a way to go around the security, thankfully father never found out. 
Through it I learned a lot about the world I was living in.
It was only hours after I have woken up and was still in my pajamas, when I heard this terrible sound. 
Someone was breaking in and then I heard these terrible bangs. 
I hid behind the couch and prayed. 
Just seconds later mother showed up in my room, warning me of this terrible cyborg person, promptly after that she was killed, and I passed out.
After that happened something in my head changed, I became… different, its like someone took control of your mind and your thoughts and I was completely not me, just a shadow that screamed for control. 
Fear was all that I saw, I was scared, alone and hopeless.
But then you showed up. I saw you as my father, someone that I desperately needed at this moment in time.
So I followed your command and your orders. 
Soon though my mind was getting healed and I was recovering, realizing who I am. 
Now thanks to you, I am back to me again, but not just me, something even more. 
Through all my life I was just alone and with my family, now there is you. I just… don’t want to be left alone, not anymore, the things I have seen and felt after I saw my mother’s death are indescribable, and I truly feel that my life even outside that moment in time was truly not what it should have ever been.
You have truly brought me back, and I am forever grateful.”

………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………

>As the story continued on you were holding her as tight as you could, making her feel safe and letting her cry and let all it out on your chest and lap.
>You stroked her beautiful body being careful not to touch anywhere bad, all those sex and clothes models be damned, she had them all beat.
>You carefully and tenderly scratched her behind ears and held her close as she laid on your lap with her head.
>You felt amazingly good having someone like this with you, and knew you made the best decision you ever could.
>As her story ends you lift her head you wash away her tears with your hand and give her a reassuring kiss on the muzzle.
>After the quick kiss, you tell her that this was all meant to be, and that there are amazing times and moments coming and that is a promise, you will stand by her side through all and will not let anyone hurt her any longer, nor will you ever let her feel alone, as that would only hurt you a hundred times more, no this is not about you it’s about her, you will push yourself through a wall of razor sharp knives just to retrieve a flower that her heart desires.
>But as much as it pains you to say, you and her need to sleep, tomorrow there is a lot more to talk about, and say to each other, so now it’s time to enjoy the comfort and a well-deserved sleep.
>Both of you begin to undress, wait, she does not any clothes you idiot, you quickly stand up and find some of your pajamas to wear for Claudia, you made sure to tell her that you are going to buy her the best looking and the most comfortable clothes money can buy next thing in the morning.
“There is no need for that, I am already beyond words… I… I just… ugh… I don’t know what I did to even earn a right for all this.”
>Nonsense you will give her everything you have, it’s time to give and no longer to take, that’s a promise.
>She just smiles and puts on your clothes, you can’t help but peak as she dresses.
>You have seen her naked so many times, but this time, it’s different.
>You see all her beauty in a different light, all the curves, all the different shades of fur.
>And her fur, wow her fur.
>Not too long but definitely not short, just the right length for when you ever wanted to feel the softest and amazing pillows in the world.
>Her breasts were exactly the size you found beautiful, not too big or small.
>Her body definitely was not what experts would call a perfect figure, but to you it was indescribably perfect.
>You also don’t know why you are suddenly getting this thoughts about her body, but you like it.
>She notices you staring and slows down her dressing a little bit, making sure you get a look from every angle, she is rather unexperienced and instead of looking sexy like she probably intended it looks like she is trying too hard… you love it.
>All that is exchanged between you two are just gazes and smiles.
>After she is done, you change yourself with her being the one that checks you out, its like a little show.
>She climbs up on the bed once more and tries to find a comfortable position in all of the pillows and covers.
>Your smile gets a little smaller as the pain starts to knock on the door in your head, so you open the drawer and down your daily dose of pills getting a questionable look from Claudia.
>You tell her to not worry about that, It’s the pills you need for the pain to go away, you smile and tell her that she is already helping so much that the pain is just like an annoying fly.
>You climb onto the bed and join her under the covers.
>You pull her close, and make her the small spoon.
>You make sure she knows she is protected, all the while reassuringly stroking her head and body. 
>This makes her tail wiggle incredibly fast against your leg and gives you a very comforting and happy feeling.
>You kiss her on the back of the head and say good night.
“Goodnight Anon, I love you.”
>There it is, the once lost thing, the most important thing in life, love.
>”I love you too Claudy.”
>Your life has changed from hell to heaven in just a day, but the inevitable feeling of dread knocks down the door and screams at you loudly.
>You punch it away with all your force letting your mind be clear once more, or so you hope.
>You drift of into the most incredibly sleep of your life, no pain, no worries, no nothing, only the warm feeling of Claudia’s fur, but the distant echoes of something coming is still there.
>You only think of one thing as the darkness starts to envelop you.
>Please don’t take her away.
>Or did you not suffer enough?